Utah statutes.
58-63-601.   State preemption of local regulation.
(1)  A political subdivision of this state may not enact any legislation,
code, or ordinance, or make any rules relating to the licensing, training, or
regulation of contract security companies or persons functioning as armed or
unarmed private security officers.
(2)  Any legislation, code, ordinance, or rules made by any political
subdivision of this state, relating to the licensing, training, or regulation
of contract security companies or individuals functioning as an armed or
unarmed private security officers are superseded by this chapter.
